Utah statutes.
17B-1-214.   Election -- Exceptions.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3) and in Subsection
17B-1-213(2)(a), an election on the question of whether the local district
should be created shall be held by:
(i)  if the proposed local district is located entirely within a single
county, the responsible clerk; or
(ii)  except as provided under Subsection (1)(b), if the proposed local
district is located within more than one county, the clerk of each county in
which part of the proposed local district is located, in cooperation with the
responsible clerk.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a)(ii), if the proposed local district is
located within more than one county and the only area of a county that is
included within the proposed local district is located within a single
municipality, the election for that area shall be held by the municipal clerk
or recorder, in cooperation with the responsible clerk.
(2)  Each election under Subsection (1) shall be held at the next special or
regular general election date that is:
(a)  for an election pursuant to a property owner or registered voter
petition, more than 45 days after certification of the petition under
Subsection 17B-1-209(3)(b)(i); or
(b)  for an election pursuant to a resolution, more than 60 days after the
latest hearing required under Section 17B-1-210.
(3)  The election requirement of Subsection (1) does not apply to:
(a)  a petition filed under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(a) if it contains the
signatures of the owners of private real property that:
(i)  is located within the proposed local district;
(ii)  covers at least 67% of the total private land area within the proposed
local district as a whole and within each applicable area; and
(iii)  is equal in value to at least 50% of the value of all private real
property within the proposed local district as a whole and within each
applicable area;
(b)  a petition filed under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(b) if it contains the
signatures of registered voters residing within the proposed local district as
a whole and within each applicable area, equal in number to at least 67% of
the number of votes cast in the proposed local district as a whole and in each
applicable area, respectively, for the office of governor at the last general
election prior to the filing of the petition;
(c)  a resolution adopted under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c) on or after May 5,
2003 that proposes the creation of a local district to provide fire
protection, paramedic, and emergency services or law enforcement service, if
the proposed local district includes a majority of the unincorporated area of
one or more counties;
(d)  a resolution adopted under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c) or (d) if the
resolution proposes the creation of a local district that has no registered
voters within its boundaries; or
(e)  a resolution adopted under Subsection 17B-1-203(1)(c) on or after May 11,
2010 that proposes the creation of a local district described in Subsection
17B-1-202(1)(a)(xiv).
(4) (a)  If the proposed local district is located in more than one county,
the responsible clerk shall coordinate with the clerk of each other county and
the clerk or recorder of each municipality involved in an election under
Subsection (1) so that the election is held on the same date and in a
consistent manner in each jurisdiction.
(b)  The clerk of each county and the clerk or recorder of each municipality
involved in an election under Subsection (1) shall cooperate with the
responsible clerk in holding the election.
(c)  Except as otherwise provided in this part, each election under Subsection
(1) shall be governed by Title 20A, Election Code.
